Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1708.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1535(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1535. Schedule of convictions and points.(a) General rule.--A point system for driver education and control is hereby established which is related to other provisions for use, suspension and revocation of the operating privilege as specified under this title. Every driver licensed in this Commonwealth who is convicted of any of the following offenses shall be assessed points as of the date of violation in accordance with the following schedule:Section Number Offense Points1234567891011121314151617181920 1512 Violation of restriction on driver's license. 21571 Violation concerning license. 33102 Failure to obey policeman or authorized person. 23111.1 Obedience to traffic-control devices warning of hazardous conditions. 23112(a)(3)(i) or (ii)Failure to stop for a red light. 33114(a)(1) Failure to stop for a flashing red light. 33302 Failure to yield half of roadway to oncoming vehicle. 33303 Improper passing. 33304 Other improper passing. 33305 Other improper passing. 33306(a)(1) Other improper passing. 43306(a)(2) Other improper passing. 33306(a)(3) Other improper passing. 33307 Other improper passing. 33310 Following too closely. 33321 Failure to yield to driver on the right at intersection. 33322 Failure to yield to oncoming driver when making left turn. 33323(b) Failure to stop for stop sign. 33323(c) Failure to yield at yield sign. 33324 Failure to yield when entering 20250HB1708PN2100 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or crossing roadway between intersections. 33327(a) or (a.1)Duty of driver in emergency response area and in relation to disabled vehicles. 23332 Improper turning around. 33341(a) Failure to obey signal indicating approach of train. 23341(b) Failure to comply with crossing gate or barrier. 4 (and 30 days' suspension)3342(b) or (e) Failure to stop at railroad crossings. 43344 Failure to stop when entering from alley, driveway or building. 33345(a) or (f.1) Failure to stop for school bus with flashing red lights. 5 (and 60 days' suspension)3345(f.2)(1) Failure to stop for school vehicle. 5(and 60 days' suspension)3361 Driving too fast for conditions. 23362 Exceeding maximum speed.--Over Limit: 6-10 2 11-15 3 16-25 4 26-30 520250HB1708PN2100 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 31-over 5 (and departmental hearing and sanctions provided under section 1538(d))3365(b) Exceeding special speed limit in school zone. 3 (and 60 days' suspension for a second or subsequent offense)3365(c) Exceeding special speed limit for trucks on downgrades. 33542(a) Failure to yield to pedestrian in crosswalk. 23547 Failure to yield to pedestrian on sidewalk. 33549(a) Failure to yield to blind pedestrian. 33702 Improper backing. 33714(a) Careless driving. 33745 Leaving scene of accident involving property damage only. 4* * *Section 2. Section 1553(d)(11) of Title 75, amended October 16, 2024 (P.L.992, No.103), is amended to read:§ 1553. Occupational limited license.* * *(d) Unauthorized issuance.--The department shall prohibit issuance of an occupational limited license to:* * *20250HB1708PN2100 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) Any person whose operating privilege has been suspended or revoked as the result of a conviction of or as a result of a court order in conjunction with an adjudication of delinquency or the granting of a consent decree for any offense under the following provisions, unless the suspension or revocation has been fully served:Section 3345(a) (relating to meeting or overtaking school bus or school vehicle).Section 3367 (relating to racing on highways and trafficways).Any violation of Ch. 37 Subch. B (relating to serious traffic offenses) or C (relating to accidents and accident reports).* * *Section 3. Section 3101(b) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 3101. Application of part.* * *(b) Serious traffic offenses.--The provisions of section 3345 (relating to meeting or overtaking school bus or school vehicle), Subchapter B of Chapter 37 (relating to serious traffic offenses) and Chapter 38 (relating to driving after imbibing alcohol or utilizing drugs) shall apply upon highways and trafficways throughout this Commonwealth.Section 4. Section 3345 heading, (g) and (j) of Title 75 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3345. Meeting or overtaking school bus or school vehicle.* * *(f.2) School vehicles.--(1) At speeds of 35 miles per hour or less, the driver 20250HB1708PN2100 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a school vehicle shall activate the school vehicle's hazard warning lights, otherwise known as four-way flashers, not less than 100 feet traveled before stopping. At speeds in excess of 35 miles per hour, the hazard warning lights shall be activated not less than 300 feet traveled before stopping.(2) The driver of a vehicle traveling in the same direction as a school vehicle shall not pass or overtake the school vehicle:(i) While the school vehicle is stopped to pick up or discharge school children.(ii) Immediately preceding and following the school vehicle's stop.(iii) While the school vehicle has activated four-way flashers.(3) Except as provided in subsection (g), the driver of a vehicle traveling in the opposite direction as a school vehicle shall proceed past the school vehicle using caution, and whenever possible shall do so at a reduced speed.(g) Exceptions from stopping requirements.--The driver of a vehicle upon a highway or trafficway with separate roadways need not stop upon meeting or passing a school bus with actuated red signal lights which is on a different roadway or a school vehicle which is on a different roadway.* * *(j) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) [or], (f.1) or (f.2) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $250 and a $35 surcharge. The surcharge shall be deposited into the School Bus Safety Grant Program Account.Section 5. Sections 3345.1(a.1)(1), 4552(b), 4553(a)(2) and 20250HB1708PN2100 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) and 6506(a)(3) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 3345.1. Automated enforcement of failure to stop for school bus with flashing red lights.* * *(a.1) Violation and liability.--(1) A motor vehicle meeting or overtaking a school bus stopped on a highway or trafficway when the red signal lights on the school bus are flashing and the side stop signal arms are activated as described in section 3345 (relating to meeting or overtaking school bus or school vehicle) is a violation of this section.* * *§ 4552. General requirements for school buses.* * *(b) Visual signals.--In addition to the applicable lighting requirements of Chapter 43 (relating to lighting equipment) every school bus shall be equipped with a uniform front and rear system of red and amber visual signals for the warning and control of traffic during route operations as provided in section 3345 (relating to meeting or overtaking school bus or school vehicle) and in regulations of the department.* * *§ 4553. General requirements for other vehicles transporting school children.(a) Buses operated by urban mass transportation systems.--* * *(2) Buses, other than school buses, operated by urban mass transportation systems for the exclusive or nonexclusive transportation of school children may, at the option of the urban mass transportation system, be equipped with flashing 20250HB1708PN2100 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 red and amber lights and may be identified by appropriate labeling as carrying school children. This equipment and identifying labels shall conform to those regulations which may be issued by the department under this paragraph. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, buses which are operated by urban mass transportation systems and which are equipped and identified in accordance with this paragraph, shall be considered school buses for purposes of section 3345(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) and (j) (relating to meeting or overtaking school bus or school vehicle). The department may issue those regulations it deems appropriate to implement this paragraph.* * *(c) [Other vehicles.--A motor vehicle used to transport children to or from school or in connection with school activities, which is not a school bus because of its limited seating capacity,] School vehicles.--A school vehicle shall comply with regulations established by the department for such vehicles. Unless required by Federal law or regulation, the regulations established by the department shall not require school vehicles which pick up and discharge school children only at locations off the highway to be of any particular color or to display flashing red and amber lights. The department shall establish additional identification requirements for school vehicles that pick up and discharge school children on a highway or trafficway. These requirements shall, at a minimum, provide for additional lighting and signage on the roof to be activated when picking up or discharging students on a highway or trafficway.§ 6506. Surcharge.20250HB1708PN2100 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Levy and imposition.--In addition to any fines, fees or penalties levied or imposed as provided by law, under this title or any other statute, a surcharge shall be levied for disposition in accordance with subsection (b) as follows:* * *(3) Upon conviction for a violation of section 3345(a) (relating to meeting or overtaking school bus or school vehicle), a surcharge of $75.* * *Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1708PN2100 - 9 - 12345678910